Wyoming, session 2025, HB0172.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 6-8-105 is created to read:
6-8-105. Exceptions for state issued concealed carry
permits; penalty.
(a) This section shall be known as and may be cited
as the "Wyoming Repeal Gun Free Zones Act."
(b) Persons lawfully carrying concealed weapons in
Wyoming under W.S. 6-8-104(a)(ii) through (iv) may carry a
concealed weapon in the following places:
(i) Any meeting of a governmental entity;
(ii) Any meeting of the legislature or a
committee thereof;
(iii) Any public airport in areas of the airport
where the carrying of concealed weapons is not prohibited
or restricted under federal law or federal regulation;
(iv) Any public building not otherwise
prohibited under W.S. 6-8-104(t) or regulated under this
section.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0172
ENROLLED ACT NO. 24, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(c) Subject to W.S. 6-8-104(t)(ix) and subsection (f)
of this section, persons lawfully carrying concealed
weapons in Wyoming with a permit issued under W.S.
6-8-104(a)(ii) may carry a concealed weapon in the
following places:
(i) Any public school, public college or
university athletic event taking place on public property
that does not sell alcoholic beverages;
(ii) Any public elementary or secondary school
facility;
(iii) Any public college or university facility.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(i) Allow the carrying of a concealed weapon
where otherwise prohibited under W.S. 6-8-104(t);
(ii) Prohibit a private property owner from
restricting firearms on his private property;
(iii) Prohibit a governmental entity from
prohibiting the open carry, display or wearing of a firearm
in its facilities or on its campus;
(iv) Allow the carrying of a concealed weapon
into facilities where otherwise prohibited by law;
(v) Allow the carrying of a concealed weapon
within state agency operated health and human services
settings, health and human services facilities that are
exempt from licensure or licensed by the department of
family services or department of corrections or health and
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0172
ENROLLED ACT NO. 24, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
human services facilities that are certified by the
behavioral health division of the department of health to
provide residential services;
(vi) Allow the carrying of a concealed weapon
within any facility where explosive or volatile materials
are present. For purposes of this paragraph "explosive or
volatile materials" shall not include materials that are
either in an insufficient amount or in a form such that the
material could not reasonably cause serious bodily injury
due to the materials explosive or volatile nature;
(vii) Prohibit a governmental entity from
requiring any employee or student to store firearms within
a concealed biometric container or a lock box within the
employee's or student's direct control at all times when
the firearms are not being carried on the employee's or
student's person, except said rules shall not:
(A) Prohibit the storage of firearms and
ammunition in public campus housing by any employee or
student authorized to carry a concealed firearm pursuant to
this section; or
(B) Require that a firearm be stored
unloaded or separate from its ammunition.
(e) Any person who knowingly prohibits entry to
another person for lawfully carrying a concealed weapon
into a place authorized pursuant to subsection (b) or (c)
of this section, unless otherwise prohibited under
subsection (d) of this section, when the person would
otherwise be permitted entry is guilty of a misdemeanor
punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year,
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0172
ENROLLED ACT NO. 24, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00),
or both.
(f) The board of trustees in each school district may
adopt rules and regulations to govern employees and
volunteers lawfully carrying concealed weapons in Wyoming
under W.S. 6-8-104 on or in any property or facility owned
or leased by the school district. If no rules and
regulations are adopted under this subsection, an employee
or a volunteer with a permit to conceal carry under W.S.
6-8-104(a)(ii) may carry a concealed weapon under W.S.
6-8-105(c)(ii) or (iii) onto school property. Any rules and
regulations adopted under this subsection shall only apply
to persons who are volunteers or employees, as defined by
subsection (g) of this section. The rules under this
subsection shall:
(i) Require any person carrying a firearm
pursuant to this section to maintain the firearm on his
person at all times or in a concealed biometric container
or lock box within the direct control of the person at all
times;
(ii) Establish ongoing training requirements,
curricula and instructor qualifications, in consultation
with local law enforcement, including:
(A) An initial course of training comprised
of not less than sixteen (16) hours of live fire handgun
training, and eight (8) hours of scenario based training
using nonlethal training, firearms and ammunition; and
(B) Annual firearm qualification and
documented recurrent training of not less than twelve (12)
hours with an approved instructor.
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0172
ENROLLED ACT NO. 24, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(g) For purposes of subsection (f) of this section,
"employee" means any person employed by a school district,
including but not limited to, superintendents, assistant
superintendents, principals, assistant principals,
teachers, guidance counselors, librarians, teacher's aids,
coaches, business managers, secretaries or administrative
assistants, janitors, bus drivers or other employees of a
school district.
(h) For purposes of this section, "governmental
entity" means the state, the university of Wyoming and any
local government as defined by W.S. 1-39-103(a)(ii).
(j) The board of trustees in any school district may
waive all or part of the training requirements of paragraph
(f)(ii) of this section for isolated rural schools and
employees in those schools.
Section 2. W.S. 6-8-104(t)(ix) and 6-8-401(c) are
amended to read:
6-8-104. Wearing or carrying concealed weapons;
penalties; exceptions; permits.
(t) No person authorized to carry a concealed weapon
pursuant to paragraphs (a)(ii) through (iv) of this section
shall carry a concealed firearm into:
(ix) Any elementary or secondary school
facility, except as provided in W.S. 21-3-132 if the person
is enrolled as a student at any elementary or secondary
school;
5

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0172
ENROLLED ACT NO. 24, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
6-8-401. Firearm, weapon and ammunition regulation
and prohibition by state.
(c) The sale, transfer, purchase, delivery, taxation,
manufacture, ownership, transportation, storage, use and
possession of firearms, weapons and ammunition shall be
authorized, regulated and prohibited by the state, and
regulation thereof is preempted by the legislature of the
state of Wyoming. Except as authorized by W.S.
15-1-103(a)(xviii) and 21-3-132 23-1-302, no state agency,
city, town, county, political subdivision or any other
entity shall authorize, regulate or prohibit the sale,
transfer, purchase, delivery, taxation, manufacture,
ownership, transportation, storage, use, carrying or
possession of firearms, weapons, accessories, components or
ammunition except as specifically provided by this chapter.
This section shall not affect zoning or other ordinances
which encompass firearms businesses along with other
businesses. Zoning and other ordinances which are designed
for the purpose of restricting or prohibiting the sale,
purchase, transfer or manufacture of firearms or ammunition
as a method of regulating firearms or ammunition are in
conflict with this section and are prohibited.
Section 3. W.S. 6-8-104(t)(iv) through (vi) and (x)
and 21-3-132 are repealed.
Section 4. The state building commission shall begin
promulgating any rules necessary to administer this act not
later than thirty (30) days after the effective date of
this act.
6

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0172
ENROLLED ACT NO. 24, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 5. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
7